Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Insurance Regulatory Information System

§ 26-3-201.
Short title.

This article is known and may be cited as the “Insurance Regulatory Information System Act”.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 108, § 1.

§ 26-3-202.
Immunity.

Members of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, their duly authorized committees, subcommittees, and task forces, their delegates, National Association of Insurance Commissioners employees, and all others charged with the responsibility of collecting, reviewing, analyzing and disseminating the information developed by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Insurance Regulatory Information System from annual statements filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners convention blanks shall be acting as agents of the commissioner under the authority of this article and in the absence of actual malice shall not be subject to civil liability for libel, slander or any other cause of action by virtue of their collection, review and analysis or dissemination of the data and information collected from the filings.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 108, § 1.

§ 26-3-203.
Confidentiality.

All financial analysis ratios and examination synopsis concerning insurance companies that are submitted to the department by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Insurance Regulatory Information System are confidential and shall not be disclosed by the department except as authorized by and in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 26-2-113(d).

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 108, § 1; 1994, ch. 76, § 2; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 26-3-204.
Filing requirements; penalty.

Each domestic, foreign or alien insurer authorized to transact insurance in this state shall annually on or before March 1, file with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners a copy of its annual statement convention blank along with such additional filings prescribed by the commissioner for the preceding year. The information filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners shall be in the same format and scope as that required by the commissioner and shall include the signed jurat page and the actuarial certification. Any amendments and addenda to the annual statement filing subsequently filed with the commissioner shall also be filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. Each insurer shall concurrently provide the National Association of Insurance Commissioners with a copy of the electronic filing containing its annual statement as required by W.S.

26-3-123

.

Foreign insurers that are domiciled in a state which has a law substantially similar to subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed in compliance with this section.

Each domestic, foreign or alien insurer authorized to transact insurance in this state shall quarterly on or before forty-five (45) days after the end of the quarter being reported, file with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners a copy of its quarterly statement blank. The information filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners shall be in the same format and scope as that required by the commissioner and shall include the signed jurat page. Any amendments and addenda to the quarterly statement filing subsequently filed with the commissioner shall also be filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. Each insurer shall concurrently provide the National Association of Insurance Commissioners with a copy of the electronic filing containing its quarterly statement as required by W.S.

26-3-123

.

The commissioner may impose a civil penalty pursuant to W.S.

26-1-107

and may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the certificate of authority of any insurer failing to file its quarterly or annual statement when due or within any extension of time which the commissioner, for good cause, may have granted.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 59, § 1; 1994, ch. 76, § 2; 2004, ch. 14, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “electronic filing” for “computer diskette” in (a) and (c).